North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159G. Water Infrastructure.
Article 4. State Water Infrastructure Commission. [Repealed]

§§ 159G-65 through 159G-67.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 14.21(c), effective July 1, 2013.

History.

Ss. 159G-65 through 159G-67; 2005-454, s. 3; repealed by 2013-360, s. 14.21(c), effective July 1, 2013.

Editor’s Note.

Former

G.S. 159G-65

pertained to the State Water Infrastructure Commission. Former G.S. 159G-66 pertained to duties of the commission. Former G.S. 159G-67 pertained to commission reports.

§§ 159G-68,
156G-69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.